Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.901

Headings and captions not part of law.

Chapter headings, part, subpart, and section or subsection captions, as used in this title do not constitute any part of the law.

[ 2003 c 111 s 159; 1965 c 9 s 29.98.020. Formerly RCW 29.98.020.]